Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-517
License and registration; suspension for nonpayment of judgment.

Upon the receipt of a copy of a judgment, the department shall forthwith suspend, except as provided in sections 60-521 to 60-523, the license and registration and the nonresident's operating privilege of any person against whom such judgment was rendered.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 17, p. 491;

Laws 1991, LB 420, § 15.